District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.15

Training for handling of, and response to, First Amendment assemblies.

The Chief of Police shall ensure that all relevant MPD personnel, including command staff, supervisory personnel, and line officers, are provided regular and periodic training on the handling of, and response to, First Amendment assemblies. The training shall be tailored to the duties and responsibilities assigned to different MPD positions and ranks during a First Amendment assembly. The training shall include instruction on the provisions of this subchapter, and the regulations issued hereunder.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 115, 52 DCR 2296